Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.530

Posting of complaint resolution and referral access point.

Each educational service district shall post on its website a prominent link to the complaint resolution and referral access point maintained by the office of the education ombuds, described in RCW 43.06B.070.

[ 2024 c 219 s 3.]